Utah statutes.
41-1a-114.   Method of giving notice.

(1)  If the division is required to give any notice under this chapter or other law regulating the operation of vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors, unless a different method of giving the notice is expressly prescribed, the notice shall be given either by:

(a)  personal delivery to the person to be notified; or

(b)  deposit in the United States mail of the notice in an envelope with postage prepaid, addressed to the person at the address shown by the records of the division.

(2)  Notice by mail is complete upon the expiration of four days after deposit of the notice.

(3)  Proof of the giving of notice in either manner specified in Subsection (1) may be made by the certificate of any officer or employee of the  division or affidavit of any person over 18 years of age, naming the person to whom the notice was given and specifying the time, place, and manner of giving the notice.

